District of Columbia statutes.
16-4701

Definitions.

For the purpose of this chapter, the term “news media” means:

(1)

Newspapers;

(2)

Magazines;

(3)

Journals;

(4)

Press associations;

(5)

News agencies;

(6)

Wire services;

(7)

Radio;

(8)

Television; or

(9)

Any printed, photographic, mechanical, or electronic means of disseminating news and information to the public.

Sept. 26, 1992, D.C. Law 9-156, § 2, 39 DCR 5682
This section is referenced in § 2-575.
1981 Ed., § 16-4701.